Massachusetts, session 194th, H3188.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “firefighter”, in lines 1468 and 1474, the following 
words:- who died in the line of duty or was.